Mississippi, session 2026, HB1505.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  There is created within the Department of Public Safety the Critical Infrastructure Emergency Mapping Grant Program to facilitate efficient emergency response by law enforcement and other first responder agencies throughout the State of Mississippi. (2)  The purpose of the program is to establish a verified, standardized and accessible source of mapping data for critical infrastructure that may be used by public safety agencies across the state within existing public safety software platforms to ensure rapid and coordinated response to emergency incidents. (3)  Subject to the availability of appropriated funds, grants and other funding sources, the Department of Public Safety shall administer the program. (4)  A municipality, county or state law enforcement agency may apply for a grant under the program for services to produce critical incident mapping data for one or more buildings or campuses over which the agency has jurisdiction.  The Department of Public Safety shall determine the terms and conditions of each grant awarded under the program.  The department shall develop instructions detailing how an agency seeking a grant under the program may apply for the grant, the information and materials that must be submitted in the grant application, and the specific criteria for eligibility under the program.  The application instructions shall be made available on the department's website. (5)  All mapping data produced under this section shall meet the following minimum requirements: (a)  Be produced in formats that conform to and integrate with emergency response software platforms currently used by public safety answering points and by local, state and federal public safety agencies without requiring agencies to utilize new software; (b)  Be printable, shareable electronically, and integrable into mobile platforms; (c)  Be verified for accuracy through on-site walk-throughs by entity producing the data; (d)  Be oriented to true north and include X, Y and Z-axis data; (e)  Include interior floor plans overlaid on verified aerial imagery; (f)  Include detailed site-specific labels; (g)  Include exterior grounds and access features; and (h)  Be provided permanently at no cost beyond initial production. (6)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the Critical Infrastructure Emergency Mapping Grant Fund.  The special fund shall consist of monies appropriated by the Legislature for funding the program, and any other monies that are made available for the purpose of the program.  Monies in the fund shall be expended by the Department of Public Safety, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purpose of the program.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the special fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned on amounts in the special fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.